Mississippi, session 2026, SB2404.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 21-39-27, Mississippi Code of 1972, is   brought forward as follows: 21-39-27.  (1)  The governing authority of any municipality may acquire one or more credit cards which may be used by members of the governing authority and municipal employees to pay expenses incurred by them when traveling in or out of the state in the performance of their official duties.  The municipal clerk shall maintain complete records of all credit card numbers and all receipts and other documents relating to the use of such credit cards. (2)  The members of the governing authority and municipal employees shall furnish receipts for the use of such credit cards each month to the municipal clerk who shall submit a written report monthly to the governing authority.  The report shall include an itemized list of all expenditures and use of the credit cards for the month, and such expenditures may be allowed for payment by the municipality in the same manner as other items on the claims docket. (3)  The issuance of a credit card to a member of the governing authority or municipal employee under the provisions of this section does not authorize the member of the governing authority or municipal employee to use the credit card to make any expenditure that is not otherwise authorized by law.  Any member of the governing authority or municipal employee who uses the credit card to make an expenditure that is not approved for payment by the governing authority shall be personally liable for the expenditure and shall reimburse the municipality. The employee shall be subject to all interest and fees and other charges related to the collection of expenditures not approved by the governing authority. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.